Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1639.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) An entity offering medicare advantage coverage to Washington residents shall disclose the following information to enrollees and potential enrollees:(a) The entity's claims denial rate expressed as a percentage;(b) The percentage of denied claims granted upon appeal; and(c) The process through which an enrollee may appeal a denial of coverage.(2) The disclosures required in subsection (1) of this section must be made prior to enrollment and upon request after enrollment.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.--- END ---